src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_CONJ_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - N - gwekishin - CONJ :

  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum	pret	dub

     #Isolation form
     gwekishin: gwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     gwekishin+Neg: gwekishinsiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekishin+1Pl: gwekishinaang
     gwekishin+1Sg: gwekishinaanh
     gwekishin+21: gwekishining
     gwekishin+2Pl: gwekishineg
     gwekishin+2Sg: gwekishinin
     gwekishin+3Obv: gwekishinnid
     gwekishin+3PlNeg: gwekishingwaa
     gwekishin+3PlPos: gwekishinwaad
     gwekishin+3Sg: gwekishind
     gwekishin+Indef: gwekishinng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     gwekishin+Pret: gwekishinban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gwekishin+Dub: gwekishinen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl: gwekishinsiwaang
     gwekishin+Neg+1Sg: gwekishinsiwaanh
     gwekishin+Neg+21: gwekishinsiwing
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl: gwekishinsiweg
     gwekishin+Neg+2Sg: gwekishinsiwin
     gwekishin+Neg+3Obv: gwekishinsiwnid
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlNeg: gwekishinsiwgwaa
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlPos: gwekishinsiwwaad
     gwekishin+Neg+3Sg: gwekishinsiwd
     gwekishin+Neg+Indef: gwekishinsiwng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     gwekishin+Neg+Pret: gwekishinsiwban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+Dub: gwekishinsiwen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekishin+1Pl+Pret: gwekishinaangban
     gwekishin+1Sg+Pret: gwekishinaanhban
     gwekishin+21+Pret: gwekishiningban
     gwekishin+2Pl+Pret: gwekishinegban
     gwekishin+2Sg+Pret: gwekishininban
     gwekishin+3Obv+Pret: gwekishinnidban
     gwekishin+3PlNeg+Pret: gwekishingwaaban
     gwekishin+3PlPos+Pret: gwekishinwaadban
     gwekishin+3Sg+Pret: gwekishindban
     gwekishin+Indef+Pret: gwekishinngban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gwekishin+1Pl+Dub: gwekishinaangen
     gwekishin+1Sg+Dub: gwekishinaanhen
     gwekishin+21+Dub: gwekishiningen
     gwekishin+2Pl+Dub: gwekishinegen
     gwekishin+2Sg+Dub: gwekishininen
     gwekishin+3Obv+Dub: gwekishinniden
     gwekishin+3PlNeg+Dub: gwekishingwaaen
     gwekishin+3PlPos+Dub: gwekishinwaaden
     gwekishin+3Sg+Dub: gwekishinden
     gwekishin+Indef+Dub: gwekishinngen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     gwekishin+Pret+Dub: gwekishinbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret: gwekishinsiwaangban
     gwekishin+Neg+1Sg+Pret: gwekishinsiwaanhban
     gwekishin+Neg+21+Pret: gwekishinsiwingban
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret: gwekishinsiwegban
     gwekishin+Neg+2Sg+Pret: gwekishinsiwinban
     gwekishin+Neg+3Obv+Pret: gwekishinsiwnidban
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret: gwekishinsiwgwaaban
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlPos+Pret: gwekishinsiwwaadban
     gwekishin+Neg+3Sg+Pret: gwekishinsiwdban
     gwekishin+Neg+Indef+Pret: gwekishinsiwngban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiwaangen
     gwekishin+Neg+1Sg+Dub: gwekishinsiwaanhen
     gwekishin+Neg+21+Dub: gwekishinsiwingen
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiwegen
     gwekishin+Neg+2Sg+Dub: gwekishinsiwinen
     gwekishin+Neg+3Obv+Dub: gwekishinsiwniden
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlNeg+Dub: gwekishinsiwgwaaen
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlPos+Dub: gwekishinsiwwaaden
     gwekishin+Neg+3Sg+Dub: gwekishinsiwden
     gwekishin+Neg+Indef+Dub: gwekishinsiwngen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+Dub: gwekishinaangbanen
     gwekishin+1Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinaanhbanen
     gwekishin+21+Pret+Dub: gwekishiningbanen
     gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+Dub: gwekishinegbanen
     gwekishin+2Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishininbanen
     gwekishin+3Obv+Pret+Dub: gwekishinnidbanen
     gwekishin+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: gwekishingwaabanen
     gwekishin+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: gwekishinwaadbanen
     gwekishin+3Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishindbanen
     gwekishin+Indef+Pret+Dub: gwekishinngbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwaangbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+1Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwaanhbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+21+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwingbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwegbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+2Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwinbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+3Obv+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwnidbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwgwaabanen
     gwekishin+Neg+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwwaadbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+3Sg+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwdbanen
     gwekishin+Neg+Indef+Pret+Dub: gwekishinsiwngbanen
     
